North Carolina, session 2025, HB1145.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to update the utilities and street
infrastructure at the corner of Highway 49 (North Tryon Street) and Eastway Drive to facilitate
the safe crossing of the intersection for pedestrians.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1145-v-1*